Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-704
Temporary location of seat of government; validity of acts done.

During such time as such temporary location or locations shall remain the emergency seat of local government of any such political subdivision, all official acts done or performed thereat by or on the part of any officer, office, council, board, court, department, or division, or any other agency or authority of such political subdivision, shall be as valid, effective and binding as if regularly done or performed at the permanent seat of local government.

Laws 1959, c. 92, § 4, p. 403;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2104.